Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202286-1243
Applicability of act.

The Small Wireless Facilities Deployment Act does not apply to the University of Nebraska system and its affiliates, the Nebraska state college system, the community college system, and all campuses, areas, and property of such systems.

Laws 2019, LB184, § 43.